Illinois, session 104th, HB4918.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Long-Term Care Trust Act. 6    Section 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Approved service" means long-term services and supports, 8including, but not limited to:9        (1) Adult day services.10        (2) Care transition coordination.11        (3) Memory care.12        (4) Adaptive equipment and technology.13        (5) Environmental modification.14        (6) Personal emergency response system.15        (7) Home safety evaluation.16        (8) Respite for family caregivers.17        (9) Home delivered meals.18        (10) Transportation.19        (11) Dementia supports.20        (12) Education and consultation.21        (13) Eligible relative care.22        (14) Professional services.23        (15) Assisted living services.  HB4918- 2 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1        (16) Adult family home services.2        (17) Nursing home services.3    "Benefit unit" means up to $100 paid by the Department to a 4long-term services and supports provider as reimbursement for 5approved services provided to an eligible beneficiary on a 6specific date.7    "Commission" means the Long-Term Services and Supports 8Trust Commission established under Section 4.9    "Consumer Price Index" means the index published by the 10Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 11Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 12services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 13average, all items, 1982-84 = 100.14    "Council" means the Long-Term Services and Supports Trust 15Council established under Section 5.16    "Department" means the Department on Aging.17    "Eligible beneficiary" means a qualified individual who is 1818 years of age or older, resides in this State, was not 19disabled before 18 years of age, has been determined to meet 20the minimum level of assistance with activities of daily 21living necessary to receive benefits through the program and 22who has not exhausted the lifetime limit of benefit units.23    "Long-term services and supports provider" means a person 24that meets the qualifications applicable under law to the 25approved service that the person provides, including a 26qualified or certified home care aide, licensed assisted   HB4918- 3 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1living facility, licensed adult family home, licensed nursing 2home, licensed in-home services agency, adult day services 3program, vendor, instructor, qualified family member, or other 4entities as registered by the Department.5    "Medicaid" or "State's Medicaid program" means the medical 6assistance program established and administered in Article V 7of the Illinois Public Aid Code as authorized under Section 81902 of the Social Security Act.9    "Premium" means the payments required under Section 9 and 10paid to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the Trust 11Fund.12    "Program" means the Long-Term Services and Supports Trust 13Program established under Section 3.14    "Qualified family member" means a relative of an eligible 15beneficiary qualified to meet the requirements established 16under law for the approved service the relative provides that 17would be required of any other long-term services and supports 18provider to receive payments from the State.19    "Qualified individual" means an individual who meets the 20duration of payment requirements established under this Act.21    "Trust Fund" means the Long-Term Services and Supports 22Trust Fund established under Section 11. 23    Section 3. Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Program. 24    (a) Establishment. The Long-Term Services and Supports 25Trust Program is established within the Department on Aging.  HB4918- 4 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1    (b) Administration. The Department, an actuary contracted 2by the Department, and the Department of Revenue shall have 3the responsibilities of implementing and administering the 4program as provided under this Section.5    (c) Department on Aging. The Department shall:6        (1) Make determinations regarding an individual's 7    status as an eligible beneficiary under Section 7.8        (2) Approve long-term services and supports eligible 9    for payment as approved services under the program, as 10    informed by the Long-Term Services and Supports Trust 11    Commission established under Section 4.12        (3) Register long-term services and supports providers 13    that meet minimum qualifications.14        (4) Discontinue the registration of long-term services 15    and supports providers that:16            (i) fail to meet the minimum qualifications 17        applicable in law to the approved service that the 18        long-term services and supports providers provide; or19            (ii) violate the operational standards of the 20        program.21        (5) Disburse payments of benefits to registered 22    long-term services and supports providers, utilizing and 23    leveraging existing payment systems for the provision of 24    approved services to eligible beneficiaries under Section 25    8.26        (6) Prepare and distribute written or electronic   HB4918- 5 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1    materials to qualified individuals, eligible 2    beneficiaries, and the public as deemed necessary by the 3    Commission to inform the public of program design and 4    updates.5        (7) Provide customer service and address questions and 6    complaints, including referring individuals to other 7    appropriate agencies.8        (8) Provide administrative and operational support to 9    the Commission.10        (9) Track data useful in monitoring and informing the 11    program, as identified by the Commission.12        (10) Track the use of lifetime benefit units to verify 13    the individual's status as an eligible beneficiary.14        (11) Ensure approved services are provided through 15    audits or service verification processes within the 16    service provider payment system for registered long-term 17    services and supports providers and recoup any 18    inappropriate payments.19        (12) Establish criteria for the payment of benefits to 20    registered long-term services and supports providers under 21    Section 8.22        (13) Establish rules and procedures for benefit 23    coordination when the eligible beneficiary is also funded 24    for Medicaid and other long-term services and supports, 25    including Medicare, workers' compensation, and private 26    long-term care coverage.  HB4918- 6 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1        (14) Adopt rules necessary to implement and administer 2    the activities specified under this Section related to the 3    program.4    (d) Department of Revenue. The Department of Revenue 5shall:6        (1) Collect and assess employee premiums as provided 7    in Section 9.8        (2) Assist the Commission, the Long-Term Services and 9    Supports Trust Council established under Section 5, and 10    the actuary contracted by the Department on Aging as 11    provided in subsection (e) in monitoring the solvency and 12    financial status of the program.13        (3) Make determinations regarding an individual's 14    status as a qualified individual under Section 6.15        (4) Adopt rules necessary to implement and administer 16    the activities specified under this Section.17    (e) Actuary. The Department on Aging shall contract with 18an actuary and the contract shall include that the actuary do 19the following:20        (1) Beginning January 1, 2029, and biennially 21    thereafter, perform an actuarial audit and valuation of 22    the Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Fund established 23    under Section 11. Additional or more frequent actuarial 24    audits and valuations may be performed at the request of 25    the Council.26        (2) Make recommendations to the Council and the   HB4918- 7 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1    General Assembly on actions necessary to maintain fund 2    solvency. The recommendations shall include options to 3    redesign or reduce benefit units, approved services, or 4    both, to prevent or eliminate any unfunded actuarially 5    accrued liability in the trust or to maintain solvency.6        (3) Select and contract for actuarial, research, 7    technical, and other consultants as the actuary deems 8    necessary to perform the actuary's duties under this Act. 9    Section 4. Long-Term Services and Supports Trust 10Commission. 11    (a) Establishment. The Long-Term Services and Supports 12Trust Commission is established. The Commission's 13recommendations and decisions shall be guided by the joint 14goals of maintaining benefit adequacy and maintaining fund 15solvency and sustainability.16    (b) Membership. The Commission shall include:17        (1) The Director of Aging, or the Director's designee.18        (2) The Director of Revenue or the Director's 19    designee.20        (3) Two members of the Senate, appointed by the 21    President of the Senate.22        (4) Two members of the House of Representatives, 23    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.24        (5) One representative of an organization representing 25    Area Agencies on Aging.  HB4918- 8 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1        (6) One representative of a home care association that 2    represents caregivers who provide services to private pay 3    and Medicaid clients.4        (7) One representative of a union representing 5    long-term care workers.6        (8) One representative of an organization representing 7    retired individuals.8        (9) One representative of an association representing 9    skilled nursing facilities and assisted living providers.10        (10) One representative of an association representing 11    adult family home providers.12        (11) Two individuals receiving long-term services and 13    supports, or their designees, or representatives of 14    consumers receiving long-term services and supports under 15    the program.16        (12) One member who is a worker who is, or will likely 17    be, paying the premium established under Section 9 and who 18    is not employed by a long-term services and supports 19    provider.20        (13) One representative of an organization of 21    employers whose members collect, or will likely be 22    collecting, the premium established under Section 9.23    (c) Terms. Except for the members under paragraphs (1), 24(2), (3), and (4) of subsection (b), members of the Commission 25shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of 2 years, except 26that the Governor shall appoint the initial members to   HB4918- 9 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1staggered terms not to exceed 4 years.2    (d) Chair. The Director of Aging, or the Director's 3designee, shall serve as chair of the Commission.4    (e) Meetings and quorum. Meetings of the Commission shall 5be at the call of the chair. A majority of the voting members 6of the Commission shall constitute a quorum for any votes of 7the Commission. Approval of 60% of those voting members of the 8Commission who are in attendance is required for the passage 9of any vote.10    (f) Recommendations. Beginning January 1, 2027, the 11Commission shall propose recommendations to the Department 12regarding:13        (1) The establishment of criteria for determining that 14    an individual has met the requirements to be a qualified 15    individual as established under Section 6 or an eligible 16    beneficiary as established under Section 7.17        (2) The establishment of criteria for minimum 18    qualifications for the registration of long-term services 19    and supports providers who provide approved services to 20    eligible beneficiaries.21        (3) The establishment of payment maximums for approved 22    services consistent with actuarial soundness which may not 23    be lower than Medicaid payments for comparable services. A 24    service or supply may be limited by dollar amount, 25    duration, or number of visits. The Commission shall engage 26    affected stakeholders to develop this recommendation.  HB4918- 10 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1        (4) Changes to rules or policies to improve the 2    operation of the program.3        (5) Providing a recommendation to the Council for the 4    annual adjustment of the benefit unit as provided under 5    this Act.6        (6) Assisting the actuary contracted by the Department 7    with the preparation of regular actuarial reports on the 8    solvency and financial status of the program and advising 9    the General Assembly on actions necessary to maintain 10    trust solvency. The Commission shall provide the actuary 11    with all actuarial reports for review. The actuary shall 12    provide any recommendations to the Commission and the 13    General Assembly on actions necessary to maintain trust 14    solvency.15        (7) Whether and how to extend coverage to individuals 16    who became disabled before 18 years of age, including the 17    impact on the financial status and solvency of the trust. 18    The Commission shall engage affected stakeholders to 19    develop this recommendation.20        (8) Consultation with the actuary contracted by the 21    Department on the development of an actuarial report of 22    the projected solvency and financial status of the 23    program. The actuary shall provide any recommendations to 24    the Commission and the General Assembly on actions 25    necessary to achieve trust solvency.26    (g) Expenses. The Commission shall monitor Department   HB4918- 11 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1administrative expenses over time. Beginning November 15, 22027, the Commission shall annually report to the Governor and 3the chairpersons and minority chairpersons of the Senate and 4House Revenue Committees on Department spending for 5administrative expenses and anticipated administrative 6expenses as the program shifts into different phases of 7implementation and operation. The November 15, 2030, report 8shall include recommendations for a method of calculating 9future Department administrative expenses to limit 10administrative expenses while providing sufficient money to 11adequately operate the program. The members under paragraphs 12(1), (2), (3), and (4) of subsection (b) may advise the 13Commission on the reports prepared under this subsection but 14must recuse themselves from the Commission's process for 15review, approval, and submission to the General Assembly.16    (h) Investment strategy subcommittee. The Commission shall 17establish an investment strategy subcommittee consisting of 18the members under paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) of 19subsection (b) as voting members of the subcommittee. In 20addition, 4 members appointed by the Governor who are 21considered experienced and qualified in the field of 22investment shall serve as nonvoting members. The subcommittee 23shall provide guidance and advice to the State Treasurer on 24investment strategies for the Trust Fund, including seeking 25counsel and advice on the types of investments that are 26constitutionally permitted.   HB4918- 12 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1    Section 5. Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Council. 2    (a) Establishment. The Long-Term Services and Supports 3Trust Council is established.4    (b) Membership. The Council shall include:5        (1) The Director of Aging, or the Director's designee.6        (2) The Director of Revenue, or the Director's 7    designee.8        (3) Two members of the Senate appointed by the 9    President of the Senate.10        (4) Two members of the House of Representatives 11    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.12        (5) A representative from the Governor's Office of 13    Management and Budget.14    (c) Adjustments to benefit unit. On an annual basis, the 15Council shall determine adjustments to the benefit unit to 16ensure benefit adequacy and solvency of the Trust Fund. The 17benefit unit shall be adjusted at a rate no greater than the 18Consumer Price Index, as determined by the Council. In 19determining adjustments to the benefit unit, the Council shall 20review the actuary's actuarial audit and valuation of the 21Trust Fund, any recommendations by the actuary and the 22Commission, data on relevant economic indicators and program 23costs and sustainability.24    (d) Chair. The Director of Aging, or the Director's 25designee, shall serve as chair of the Council.  HB4918- 13 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1    (e) Meetings and quorum. The Council shall meet at least 2once annually to determine adjustments to the benefit unit 3under subsection (c). Additional meetings of the Council shall 4be at the call of the chair. A majority of the voting members 5of the Council shall constitute a quorum for any votes of the 6Council. Approval of 60% of the members of the Council who are 7in attendance is required for the passage of any vote. The 8Council may adopt rules for the conduct of meetings, including 9provisions for meetings and voting to be conducted by 10telephonic, video, or other conferencing process. 11    Section 6. Qualifying beneficiaries. 12    (a) Determination. The Department of Revenue shall deem an 13individual to be a qualified individual as provided under this 14Act if the individual has paid the long-term services and 15supports premiums required under Section 9 for the equivalent 16of either:17        (1) a total of 10 years without interruption of 5 or 18    more consecutive years; or19        (2) 3 years within the last 6 years.20    (b) Requirements. When deeming an individual to be a 21qualified individual, the Department of Revenue shall require 22that the individual have worked at least 500 hours during each 23of the 10 years in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) and each of 24the 3 years in paragraph (2) of subsection (a).   HB4918- 14 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1    Section 7. Disbursement of benefits. 2    (a) General rule. Beginning January 1, 2030, approved 3services shall be available and benefits payable to a 4registered long-term services and supports provider on behalf 5of an eligible beneficiary under this Section.6    (b) Eligible beneficiary. A qualified individual may 7become an eligible beneficiary by filing an application with 8the Department and undergoing an eligibility determination 9which includes an evaluation that the qualified individual 10requires assistance with at least 3 activities of daily 11living. The Department shall engage a qualified assessor so 12that the determination may be made within 45 days from receipt 13of the application by the qualified individual to use a 14benefit.15    (c) Receipt of services and benefits. An eligible 16beneficiary:17        (1) May receive approved services and benefits through 18    the program in the form of a benefit unit payable to a 19    registered long-term services and supports provider.20        (2) May not receive more than the dollar equivalent of 21    365 benefit units over the course of the eligible 22    beneficiary's lifetime.23    (d) Reimbursements. If the Department reimburses a 24long-term services and supports provider for approved services 25provided to an eligible beneficiary and the payment is less 26than the benefit unit, only the portion of the benefit unit   HB4918- 15 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1that is used shall be taken into consideration when 2calculating the individual's remaining lifetime limit on 3receipt of benefits.4    (e) Combination of benefit units. Eligible beneficiaries 5may combine benefit units to receive more approved services 6per day as long as the total number of lifetime benefit units 7has not been exceeded. 8    Section 8. Benefits. 9    (a) Payment. Benefits provided under this Act shall be 10paid periodically and promptly to registered long-term 11services and supports providers.12    (b) Qualified family members. Qualified family members may 13be paid for approved personal care services in the same way as 14individual providers, through a licensed home care agency or 15through a third option if recommended by the Commission and 16adopted by the Department. 17    Section 9. Payroll premium. 18    (a) General rule. Beginning January 1, 2027, the 19Department of Revenue shall assess for each individual in 20employment with an employer a premium based on the amount of 21the individual's wages. The initial premium rate shall be 220.58% of the individual's wages. Beginning January 1, 2029, 23and biennially thereafter, the premium rate shall be set by 24the Illinois Commission on Government Forecasting and   HB4918- 16 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1Accountability at a rate no greater than 0.58%. In addition, 2the Illinois Commission on Government Forecasting and 3Accountability shall set the premium rate at the lowest amount 4necessary to maintain the actuarial solvency of the Trust Fund 5in accordance with recognized insurance principles and 6designed to attempt to limit fluctuations in the premium rate. 7To facilitate the premium rate setting the actuary contracted 8by the Department shall perform a biennial actuarial audit and 9valuation of the Trust Fund and make recommendations to the 10Illinois Commission on Government Forecasting and 11Accountability.12    (b) Duties of employers. An employer shall:13        (1) Collect from employees the premiums provided under 14    subsection (a) through payroll deductions and remit the 15    amounts collected to the Department of Revenue.16        (2) In collecting employee premiums through payroll 17    deductions, act as the agent of the employees and shall 18    remit the amounts to the Department of Revenue as required 19    by this Act.20    (c) Collective bargaining agreements. Nothing in this Act 21shall require a party to a collective bargaining agreement 22taking effect within 24 months or less of the effective date of 23this Act to reopen negotiations of the agreement or to apply 24any of the responsibilities under this Act unless and until 25the existing agreement is reopened or renegotiated by the 26parties or expires.  HB4918- 17 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1    (d) Collection. Premiums shall be collected in the manner 2and at such intervals as provided by the Department of 3Revenue.4    (e) Deposit of premiums. The Department of Revenue shall 5deposit all premiums collected under this Section into the 6Trust Fund.7    (f) Increase of premiums. If the premiums under this 8Section are increased, the Department of Revenue shall notify 9each qualified individual by mail that the individual's 10premiums have been increased, describe the reason for 11increasing the premiums and describe the plan for restoring 12the money so that premiums are returned to 0.58% of the 13individual's wages.14    (g) Exemption. An employee who demonstrates that the 15employee has long-term care insurance is exempt from the 16premium assessment under this Section. 17    Section 10. Self-employed individuals. 18    (a) Electing coverage. Beginning January 1, 2027, a 19self-employed individual, including a sole proprietor, 20independent contractor, partner, or joint venturer may elect 21coverage under this Act. An individual electing coverage under 22this subsection is responsible for payment of all premiums 23assessed to an employee under Section 9. The individual shall 24file a notice of election in writing with the Department of 25Revenue, in a manner prescribed by the Department of Revenue.   HB4918- 18 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1The individual shall be eligible for benefits after paying the 2long-term services and supports premium for the time required 3under Section 6.4    (b) Withdraw from coverage. A self-employed individual who 5has elected coverage may withdraw from coverage at times 6prescribed by the Department of Revenue by filing a notice of 7withdrawal in writing with the Department of Revenue, with the 8withdrawal to take effect no sooner than 30 days after filing 9the notice with the Department of Revenue.10    (c) Cancellation. The Department of Revenue may cancel 11elective coverage if the self-employed individual fails to 12make required payments or file reports. The Department of 13Revenue may collect due and unpaid premiums and may levy an 14additional premium for the remainder of the period of 15coverage. The cancellation shall be effective no later than 30 16days from the date of the notice in writing advising the 17self-employed individual of the cancellation.18    (d) Rules. The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules for 19determining the hours worked and the wages of individuals who 20elect coverage under this Section and for the enforcement of 21this Section. 22    Section 11. Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Fund. 23    (a) Establishment. The Long-Term Services and Supports 24Trust Fund is created as a trust fund in the State treasury. 25The Trust Fund shall be held separate and apart from all public   HB4918- 19 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1moneys or funds of this State. The Trust Fund shall consist of 2all receipts from employers as provided under Section 9 as 3well as any moneys appropriated to the Department for the 4purposes of this Act. Interest earned on moneys in the Trust 5Fund shall be deposited into the Trust Fund.6    (b) Trust Fund Administration. 7        (1) All receipts from employers under Section 9 shall 8    be deposited into the Trust Fund.9        (2) Expenditures from the Trust Fund may be used for 10    the administrative activities of the Department and the 11    Department of Revenue.12        (3) Benefits associated with the program shall be 13    disbursed from the Trust Fund by the Department. Only the 14    Director of Aging, or the Director's designee, may 15    authorize disbursements from the Trust Fund.16        (4) The Trust Fund shall provide reimbursement of any 17    amounts from other sources that may have been used for the 18    initial establishment of the program.19    (c) Utilization of revenue. The revenue generated under 20this Act shall be utilized to expand long-term care in this 21State. The money may not be used either in whole or in part to 22supplant existing State or county money for programs that meet 23the definition of approved services.24    (d) Money expended for other purposes. Money deposited 25into the Trust Fund shall remain in the Trust Fund until 26expended in accordance with the requirements of this Act. If   HB4918- 20 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1money is expended for any purpose other than supporting the 2long-term services and supports program, the Department of 3Revenue shall notify each qualified individual by mail that 4the individual's premiums have been expended for an alternate 5use, describe the alternate use and state the Department of 6Revenue's plan for restoring the money so that premiums are 7not increased and benefits are not reduced. 8    Section 12. Management of Trust Fund. 9    (a) Investment of money in Trust Fund. The Department 10shall have the State Treasurer invest the money in the Trust 11Fund. The State Treasurer shall have full power to invest, 12reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment money 13in the Trust Fund.14    (b) Investment policy. All investments made by the State 15Treasurer shall be made with the degree of judgment and care 16required and the investment policy established by the State 17Treasury.18    (c) Investment with other funds. As deemed appropriate by 19the State Treasurer, money in the Trust Fund may be commingled 20for investment with other funds subject to investment by the 21State Treasurer.22    (d) Policies. The Department shall establish all policies 23relating to the Trust Fund, other than the investment policies 24as provided under this Section.25    (e) Disbursement. With the exception of expenses of the   HB4918- 21 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1State Treasurer under this Section, disbursements from the 2Trust Fund shall be made only on the authorization of the 3Director of Aging, or the Director's designee, and money in 4the Trust Fund may be spent only for the purposes specified 5under this Act.6    (f) Consultation. The State Treasurer shall routinely 7consult and communicate with the Department on the investment 8policy, earnings of the Trust Fund, and related needs of the 9program. 10    Section 13. Appeals. Determinations made by the Department 11under this Act, including determinations regarding functional 12eligibility or related to registration of long-term services 13and support providers, are subject to judicial review in 14accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Review 15Law. In addition, the standards and procedures adopted for 16judicial review under this Section shall address the 17following:18        (1) Timelines.19        (2) Eligibility and benefit determination.20        (3) Fees. 21    Section 14. Information sharing. The Department shall:22        (1) Seek access to Medicare data from the Centers for 23    Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States 24    Department of Health and Human Services to analyze the   HB4918- 22 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1    potential savings in Medicare expenditures due to the 2    operation of the program.3        (2) Apply for a demonstration waiver from the Centers 4    for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States 5    Department of Health and Human Services to allow for the 6    State to share in the savings generated in the federal 7    match for Medicaid long-term services and supports and 8    Medicare due to the operation of the program.9        (3) Submit a report on the status of the waiver to 10    General Assembly by December 1, 2027. 11    Section 15. Report. Beginning December 1, 2031, and 12annually thereafter, the Commission shall report to the 13General Assembly on the program, including:14        (1) Projected and actual program participation.15        (2) Adequacy of premium rates.16        (3) Trust Fund balances.17        (4) Benefits paid.18        (5) Demographic information on program participants, 19    including age, gender, race, ethnicity, geographic 20    distribution by county, legislative district, and 21    employment sector.22        (6) The extent to which the operation of the program 23    has resulted in savings to the State's Medicaid program by 24    avoiding costs that would have otherwise been the 25    responsibility of the State.   HB4918- 23 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1    Section 16. Auditor General audits. By December 1, 2031, 2the Auditor General must conduct, in accordance with the 3Illinois State Auditing Act, a financial, compliance, and 4performance audit of the Long-Term Services and Supports Trust 5Program and deliver a report, including a conclusion and 6recommendations for improvement to the General Assembly 7regarding:8        (1) Program operations, including the performance of 9    the Commission established in Section 4;10        (2) Program financial status, including solvency, the 11    value of the benefit provided, and the financial balance 12    of program benefits to costs.13        (3) The overall efficacy of the program, based on the 14    established goals under this Act including, but not 15    limited to:16            (i) delaying middle class families' need to spend 17        to poverty to receive Medicaid-funded long-term care;18            (ii) strengthening the State economy through 19        improving workforce participation;20            (iii) reducing the caseload and expenditures of 21        the State Medicaid program on long-term care; and22            (iv) obtaining shared savings through a Medicaid 23        demonstration waiver. 24    Section 17. Exclusions. Any benefits used by an individual   HB4918- 24 -LRB104 17999 KTG 31436 b1under this Act are not income or resources for any 2determinations of eligibility for any other State program or 3benefit, Medicaid, a State-federal program, or for any other 4means-tested program. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.